Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3202
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Respiratory Care Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-3203 to 38-3206 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1068.